Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-307
Absence of judge; adjournment by written order.

If the judge be sick, or for any other sufficient cause is unable to attend court at the regularly appointed time, he may, by a written order, direct an adjournment to a particular day therein specified, and the clerk shall, on the first day of the term, or as soon thereafter as he received the order, adjourn the court as therein directed.

Laws 1879, § 31, p. 88;

R.S.1913, § 1166;

C.S.1922, § 1089;

C.S.1929, § 27-307;

R.S.1943, § 24-307.

Sufficient reason is presumed. Winder v. Winder, 86 Neb. 495, 125 N.W. 1095 (1910).

Term may be adjourned for sufficient reason. Russell v. State, 77 Neb. 519, 110 N.W. 380 (1906).

Judge may by written order in vacation adjourn regular term to specified date. Parrott v. Wolcott, 75 Neb. 530, 106 N.W. 607 (1906).

Adjournment of court to a holiday is null. Polin v. State, 14 Neb. 540, 16 N.W. 898 (1883).

Reason for adjournment is not reviewable. Smith v. State, 4 Neb. 277 (1876).